Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1316.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 449.3. Pending Medical Assistance Applications.--(a) The department shall develop and implement a standardized process to be adhered to by all county assistance offices when a medical assistance application for long-term care services is received. The process must include the following requirements:(1) Prior to rendering a decision on a medical assistance application, the caseworker assigned to the application shall:(i) Review and take into account all submitted documentation related to the individual's eligibility for long-term care medical assistance.12345678910111213141516171819 (ii) Use all resources and tools available, including the Asset Verification System, to obtain documentation necessary to make an informed decision on the application.(iii) If, after considering and reviewing all submitted documentation and other accessible information available, additional documentation is needed, no later than ten days from the date of the application, send a pending letter to the provider electronically, advising the provider of the following:(A) a list of any specific outstanding documentation needed to render an informed decision on the application;(B) direct contact information for the caseworker assigned to the application; and(C) a time frame to submit the outstanding documentation requested.(iv) Communicate weekly with the provider, using a standardized electronic communication template developed by the department to provide status of the application and specify any outstanding documentation needed to process the application.(2) When a medical assistance application for long-term care services is denied, the caseworker assigned to the application shall:(i) Honor the provider's request for a reconsideration of the denial and, within ten days of receipt of related documents, review and take appropriate action on the application. If, as a result of the review of the information, the application can be approved, approve the application and issue a notice of eligibility to the provider within seven calendar days. If the application cannot be approved, send an electronic notice stating the reason for the denial and any additional information or documentation that is needed.20260SB1316PN1671 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Review and act on any newly submitted documentation subsequent to a request for a fair hearing within ten days of receipt of the documentation. If, as a result of the review of the new documentation, the application can be approved, approve the application and issue a notice of eligibility to the provider within seven calendar days.(3) Regardless of the status of the medical assistance application for long-term care services, including pending, denied, appealed or under stipulation, the caseworker assigned to the application shall review and act on all submitted documentation within ten days of receipt. If, after review of the documentation, the application can be approved, issue an eligibility notice to the provider within seven calendar days.(4) No later than ninety days following the end of each calendar year, the department shall issue a public report, for the prior calendar year, to the chair of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the chair of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives that includes the following information from county assistance offices:(i) The total number of medical assistance applications for long-term care services submitted.(ii) The total number of medical assistance applications for long-term care services approved on initial determination.(iii) The total number of medical assistance applications for long-term care services denied on initial determination and approved through the appeal process.(iv) The total number of medical assistance applications for long-term care services approved for uncompensated care payments.(v) The total number of medical assistance applications for 20260SB1316PN1671 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 long-term care services approved for uncompensated care payments but denied on final determination.(5) The report under paragraph (4) shall be made publicly available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) If a resident has an application of eligibility for medical assistance long-term care services in a nursing facility pending with the department, the department shall include:(1) the resident in the nursing facility's census as a medical assistant resident; and(2) the resident's case-mix index picture date data in the rate determination for the relevant rate quarter during the time the application is pending.(c) If a medical assistance application for an individual residing at a long-term care provider has been pending at the department for at least sixty days for one of the following reasons, the provider may request an uncompensated care payment from the department:(1) the determination of an initial or renewal application of medical assistance has not been made; or(2) the initial medical assistance application was denied, and an appeal was submitted and received by the department to amend the application.(d) The department shall make payment to the provider for the uncompensated care as though the application were approved, beginning on the date of request for uncompensated care payment. Payment under this subsection shall not be made for the dates of service prior to the provider's request but shall continue thereafter until the department makes a final determination on the application.20260SB1316PN1671 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) If the determination for benefits is denied, the department shall have the right of recovery, offset or recoupment with respect to payments made for dates of service beginning with initial application through sixty days following the request of the provider to receive an uncompensated care payment. The department may not recover, offset or recoup payments received for dates of service for the period sixty days after the date of the provider's request for uncompensated care payments. In the event the application is approved, the department may offset payments due for the dates of service between the date of the provider's request and the final determination by amounts already paid.(f) A provider providing uncompensated care to a medical assistance applicant that submitted an application on behalf of the applicant shall be provided the status of the application from the county assistance office on a weekly basis until the application has final resolution.(g) A provider providing uncompensated care to a medical assistance applicant that did not submit the application on behalf of the applicant may inquire of the secretary or designee as to the status of the individual's application, and the secretary or designee shall respond within five business days as follows:(1) If the provider has not obtained a signed release, the secretary or designee shall provide the following information only in writing:(i) whether or not the application has been approved;(ii) the identity of any authorized representative; and(iii) if the application has not yet been decided whether or not the application is a complete application.20260SB1316PN1671 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) If the provider has obtained a signed release, the secretary or designee shall, in addition to the information listed under paragraph (1), provide any other information requested by the provider, to the extent that the release permits disclosure of the information.(h) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Long-term care provider" or "provider" means as follows:(1) One of the following:(i) A long-term care nursing facility that is:(A) licensed by the Department of Health;(B) enrolled in the Medical Assistance Program as a provider of nursing facility services; and(C) owned by an individual, partnership, association or corporation and operated on a profit or nonprofit basis.(ii) A county nursing facility as defined under 55 Pa. Code § 1187.2 (relating to definitions).(iii) A managed care program that provides all-inclusive care for elderly individuals in this Commonwealth as established in accordance with 42 CFR Pt. 460 (relating to programs of all-inclusive care for the elderly (PACE)).(2) The term does not include an intermediate care facility for persons with an intellectual disability, Federal-owned or State-owned long-term care nursing facility or veterans' home."Long-term care services" means services provided by a long-term care provider.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1316PN1671 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728